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DTC C 1242 / 42 IG2 Power Source Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1242 /42
With the vehicle running, open circuit in IG2 is detected for
more than 7 sec.

SBattery
S IC regulator
SPowersourcecircuit

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the power source circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and prohibits
ABS & BA & TRC & VSC controls and the brake system becomes normal.
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Checkbatteryvoltage.

OK:
Voltage: 10 − 14 V

NG Check and repair the charging system.

OK

2 Check voltage of the ECU IG power source.

Incaseofusingthehand −held tester:
PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held testermainswitchON.
(c)Select theDATALISTmodeon thehand −held tester.
CHECK:
Check thevoltageconditionoutput fromtheECUdisplayedon thehand −held tester.
OK:

”Normal” is displayed.

Incaseofnotusingthehand −held tester:
PREPARATION:
Remove ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU with connectors still con-
nected.
CHECK:
(a) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(b) Measure voltage between terminals IG2 and GND of ABS

& BA & TRC & VSC ECU connector.
OK:

Voltage: 10 − 14 V

OK Turn ignition switch OFF, check and replace
ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU.

NG
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3 Check continuity between terminal GND of ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU connec-
tor and body ground.

CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminal GND of ABS & BA & TRC
& VSC ECU connector and body ground.
OK:

Resistance: 1 � or less

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check for open circuit in harness and connector between ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU and bat-
tery (See page IN−35).


